California statutes. Insurance Code
 industry standards and practices and all applicable statutes, rules, and regulations, and (B) examine the management and supervisory systems overseeing the claims functions. The audits shall be conducted by the association or an independent auditor, provided that the three largest service companies, as measured by the number of claims processed for the association during the previous three fiscal years, shall be audited by an independent auditor at least once every three years. The association shall implement systems to retain independent auditing firms for the purpose of this paragraph, provided that no one firm is designated or utilized as an exclusive provider. Audits conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted annually to the commissioner for review.

(j) The commissioner shall examine the association to the same extent as, and in accordance with, the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 729) of Chapter 1 of Part 2
 of Division 1, which sets forth the examination requirements applicable to admitted insurers. A copy of the examination report shall be filed with the Chairpersons of the Senate and Assembly Committees on Insurance no later than December 31 of the year the report is completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 16.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Member insurer” means an insurer required to be a member of the association in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1063, except and to the extent that the insurer is participating in an insolvency program adopted by the United States government.

(b) “Insolvent insurer” means an insurer that was a member insurer of the association, consistent with paragraph (11) of subdivision (c), either at the time the policy was issued or when the insured event occurred, and against which an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, or, in the case of the State
 Compensation Insurance Fund, if a finding of insolvency is made by a duly
 enacted legislative measure.

(c) (1) “Covered claims” means the obligations of an insolvent insurer, including the obligation for unearned premiums, that satisfy all of the following requirements:

(A) Imposed by law and within the coverage of an insurance policy of the insolvent insurer.

(B) Which were unpaid by the insolvent insurer.

(C) Which are presented as a claim to the liquidator in the state of domicile of the insolvent insurer or to the association on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary liquidating proceedings.

(D) Which were incurred before the date coverage under the policy terminated and before, on, or within 30 days after the date the liquidator was appointed.

(E) For which the assets of the insolvent insurer are insufficient to discharge in full.

(F) In the case of a policy of workers’ compensation insurance, to provide workers’ compensation benefits under the workers’ compensation law of this state or under the workers’ compensation law of any state if the injured worker is a resident of this state and not otherwise entitled to coverage from an organization similar to the association in any other state.

(G) In the case of other classes of insurance if the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at the
 time of the insured occurrence, or the property from which the claim arises is permanently located in this state.

(2) “Covered claims” also includes the obligations assumed by an assuming insurer from a ceding insurer when the assuming insurer subsequently becomes an insolvent insurer if, at the time of the insolvency of the assuming insurer, the ceding insurer is no longer admitted to transact business in this state. Both the assuming insurer and the ceding insurer shall have been member insurers at the time the assumption was made. “Covered claims” under this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1), except for the requirement that the claims be against policies of the insolvent insurer. The association has a right to recover a deposit, bond, or other assets that may have been
 required to be posted by the ceding company to the extent of covered claim payments and shall be subrogated to any rights the policyholders may have against the ceding insurer.

(3) “Covered claims” does not include obligations arising from the following:

(A) Life, annuity, health, or disability insurance.

(B) Mortgage guaranty, financial guaranty, or other forms of insurance offering protection against investment risks.

(C) Fidelity or surety insurance including fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding obligations.

(D) Credit insurance.

(E) Title insurance.

(F) Ocean marine insurance or ocean marine coverage under an insurance policy, including claims arising from the following: the Jones Act (46 U.S.C. Secs. 30104 and 30105), the Longshore and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 901 et seq.), or any other similar federal statutory enactment, or an endorsement or policy affording protection and indemnity coverage.

(G) A claims servicing agreement or insurance policy providing retroactive insurance of a known loss or losses, except a special excess workers’ compensation policy issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3702.8 of the Labor Code that covers all or any part of workers’ compensation liabilities of an employer that is issued, or was previously issued, a certificate of
 consent to self-insure pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3700 of the Labor Code.

(4) “Covered claims” does not include an obligation of the insolvent insurer arising out of a reinsurance contract, an obligation incurred after the expiration date of the insurance policy or after the insurance policy has been replaced by the insured, canceled at the insured’s request, or canceled by the liquidator, or an obligation to a state or to the federal government. If the individual has a covered claim that includes medical services provided by a medical facility owned in whole or in part by a state or federal agency, the association may pay that claim directly to the facility, as long as the services provided otherwise qualify as a covered claim and the claim is owned by the medical facility asserting the claim.

(5) (A) “Covered claims” does not include an obligation to insurers, insurance pools, or underwriting associations, nor their claims for contribution, indemnity, or subrogation, equitable or otherwise, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(B) An insurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association may not maintain, in its own name or in the name of its insured, a claim or legal action against the insured of the insolvent insurer for contribution, indemnity, or by way of subrogation, except insofar as, and to the extent only, that the claim exceeds the policy limits of the insolvent insurer’s policy. In those claims or legal actions, the insured of the insolvent insurer is entitled to a credit or setoff in the amount of the policy limits of the insolvent
 insurer’s policy, or in the amount of the limits remaining, when those limits have been diminished by the payment of other claims.

(6) “Covered claims,” except in cases involving a claim for workers’ compensation benefits or for unearned premiums, does not include a claim in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or less or the portion of a claim that is in excess of the applicable limits provided in the insurance policy issued by the insolvent insurer.

(7) (A) “Covered claims” does not include that portion of a claim, other than a claim for workers’ compensation benefits, that is in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), with respect to a policy of
 residential property insurance, each claim for a loss under a different coverage category shall be considered a separate covered claim.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a claim for damage to, or loss of, a dwelling structure under a policy of residential property insurance shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) or the amount recoverable under the policy, whichever is less.

(8) “Covered claims” does not include an amount awarded as punitive or exemplary damages, or an amount awarded by the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board pursuant to Section 5814 or 5814.5 of the Labor Code because payment of compensation was unreasonably delayed or refused by the insolvent insurer.

(9) “Covered claims” does not
 include either of the following:

(A) A claim to the extent it is covered by any other insurance of a class covered by this article available to the claimant or insured.

(B) A claim by a person other than the original claimant under the insurance policy in the claimant’s own name, the claimant’s assignee as the person entitled thereto under a premium finance agreement as defined in Section 673 and entered into before insolvency, or the claimant’s executor, administrator, guardian, or other personal representative or trustee in bankruptcy, and does not include a claim asserted by an assignee or one claiming by right of subrogation, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(10) “Covered claims” does not include an obligation
 arising out of the issuance of an insurance policy written by the separate division of the State Compensation Insurance Fund pursuant to Sections 11802 and 11803.

(11) “Covered claims” does not include an obligation of the insolvent insurer arising from a policy or contract of insurance issued or renewed before the insolvent insurer’s admission to transact insurance in the State of California.

(12) “Covered claims” does not include surplus deposits of subscribers as defined in Section 1374.1.

(13) “Covered claims” shall also include an obligation arising under an insurance policy written to indemnify a permissibly self-insured employer pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 3700 of the Labor Code for its
 liability to pay workers’ compensation benefits in excess of a specific or aggregate retention. However, for purposes of this article, those claims shall not be considered workers’ compensation claims and therefore are subject to the per-claim limit in paragraph (7), and any payments and expenses related thereto shall be allocated to category (c) for claims other than workers’ compensation, homeowners’, and automobile, as provided in Section 1063.5.

These provisions shall apply to obligations arising under a policy as described herein issued to a permissibly self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers pursuant to Section 3700 of the Labor Code and notwithstanding any other provision of this code, those obligations shall be governed by this provision in the event that the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund is ordered to assume the liabilities of
 a permissibly self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers pursuant to Section 3701.5 of the Labor Code. This paragraph applies only to insurance policies written to indemnify a permissibly self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers under subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 3700 of the Labor Code, for its liability to pay workers’ compensation benefits in excess of a specific or aggregate retention, and this paragraph does not apply to special excess workers’ compensation insurance policies unless issued pursuant to authority granted in subdivision (c) of Section 3702.8 of the Labor Code, and as provided for in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3). In addition, this paragraph does not apply to a claims servicing agreement or insurance policy providing retroactive insurance of a known loss or losses as are excluded in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3).

A permissibly self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers, or the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, shall, to the extent required by the Labor Code, be responsible for paying, adjusting, and defending each claim arising under policies of insurance covered under this section, unless the benefits paid on a claim exceed the specific or aggregate retention, in which case:

(A) If the benefits paid on the claim exceed the specific or aggregate retention, and the policy requires the insurer to defend and adjust the claim, the association shall be solely responsible for adjusting and defending the claim, and shall make all payments due under the claim, subject to the limitations and exclusions of this article with regard to covered claims. As to each claim subject to this paragraph, notwithstanding any
 other provisions of this code or the Labor Code, and regardless of whether the amount paid by CIGA is adequate to discharge a claim obligation, neither the self-insured employer, group of self-insured employers, nor the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund shall have an obligation to pay benefits over and above the specific or aggregate retention, except as provided in this subdivision.

(B) If the benefits paid on the claim exceed the specific or aggregate retention, and the policy does not require the insurer to defend and adjust the claim, the permissibly self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers, or the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, shall not have any further payment obligations with respect to the claim, but shall continue defending and adjusting the claim, and shall have the right, but not the obligation, in a proceeding to assert
 all applicable statutory limitations and exclusions as contained in this article with regard to the covered claim. CIGA shall have the right, but not the obligation, to intervene in a proceeding in which the self-insured employer, group of self-insured employers, or the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund is defending a claim and shall be permitted to raise the appropriate statutory limitations and exclusions as contained in this article with respect to covered claims. Regardless of whether the self-insured employer or group of self-insured employers, or the
 Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, asserts the applicable statutory limitations and exclusions, or whether CIGA intervenes in a proceeding, CIGA shall be solely responsible for paying all benefits due on the claim, subject to the exclusions and limitations of this article with respect to covered claims. As to each claim subject to this paragraph, notwithstanding any other provision of this code or the Labor Code and regardless of whether the amount paid by CIGA is adequate to discharge a claim obligation, neither the self-insured employer, group of self-insured employers, nor the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund, shall have an obligation to pay benefits over and above the specific or aggregate retention, except as provided in this subdivision.

(C) In the event that the benefits paid on the covered claim exceed the per-claim limit in
 paragraph (7), the responsibility for paying, adjusting, and defending the claim shall be returned to the permissibly self-insured employer or group of employers, or the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

These provisions shall apply to all pending and future insolvencies. For purposes of this paragraph, a pending insolvency is one involving a company that is currently receiving benefits from the guarantee association.

(14) “Covered claims” also includes all obligations arising under a policy issued to cover cybersecurity, as long as the association’s total liability for all those obligations does not exceed one
 million dollars ($1,000,000) or the policy limits, whichever is less. Cybersecurity claims shall be covered by the account categorized pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5, unless the coverage is specifically attached to a policy that would otherwise be covered by an account categorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1063.5.

(15) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section or Section 1063, if an insurance policy has been allocated to or assumed by a company that did not issue the policy pursuant to a state statute that provides for the division of an
 insurance company or the statutory assumption of designated policies by a new company, that statute provides a novation has been deemed to have occurred with respect to those policies, and that company is placed in liquidation, then to the extent a claim arising under that allocated or transferred policy would have been a covered claim had the original company been placed in liquidation before the statutory allocation or assumption, any claim arising under that same policy shall be a covered claim regardless of whether the company that allocated or assumed the policy was or was not a member at the time the policy was issued or when the insured event occurred.

(d) “Admitted to transact insurance in this state” means an insurer possessing a valid certificate of authority issued by the department.

(e) “Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with an insolvent insurer on December 31 of the year next preceding the date the insurer becomes an insolvent insurer.

(f) “Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person. Control is presumed to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, 10 percent or more of the voting
 securities of any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by showing that control does not in fact exist.

(g) “Claimant” means an insured making a first party claim or a person instituting a liability claim. However, no person who is an affiliate of the insolvent insurer may be a claimant.

(h) “Net direct written premiums” means the amount of direct written premiums in the annual financial statement on file with the commissioner, adjusted for any premiums written for any lines of insurance or types of coverages not covered by this article, plus premiums written in this state for coverage under a special excess workers’ compensation policy.

(i) “Ocean marine insurance” includes marine insurance as defined in
 Section 103, except for inland marine insurance, as well as any other form of insurance, regardless of the name, label, or marketing designation of the insurance policy, that insures against maritime perils or risks and other related perils or risks, that are usually insured against by traditional marine insurance such as hull and machinery, marine builders’ risks, and marine protection and indemnity. Those perils and risks insured against include, without limitation, loss, damage, or expense or legal liability of the insured arising out of or incident to ownership, operation, chartering, maintenance, use, repair, or construction of a vessel, craft, or instrumentality in use in ocean or inland waterways, including liability of the insured for personal injury, illness, or death for loss or damage to the property of the insured or another person.

(j) “Unearned premium” means that portion of a premium as calculated by the liquidator that had not been earned because of the cancellation of the insolvent insurer’s policy and is that premium remaining for the unexpired term of the insolvent insurer’s policy. “Unearned premium” does not include an amount sought as return of a premium under a policy providing retroactive insurance of a known loss or return of a premium under a retrospectively rated policy or a policy subject to a contingent surcharge or a policy in which the final determination of the premium cost is computed after expiration of the policy and is calculated on the basis of actual loss experienced during the policy
 period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.2.

(a) The association shall pay and discharge covered claims and, in connection therewith, pay for or furnish loss adjustment services and defenses of claimants when required by policy provisions. It may do so either directly by itself or through a servicing facility or through a contract for reinsurance and assumption of liabilities by one or more member insurers or through a contract with the liquidator, upon terms satisfactory to the association and to the liquidator, under which payments on covered claims would be made by the liquidator using funds provided by the association. Alternatively, the association may, with the express approval of the commissioner, reinsure with, or transfer liabilities to, a California admitted and authorized reinsurer or other reinsurer approved by the commissioner to limit or eliminate adverse
 development, to stabilize or limit the need for assessments, or to reduce its potential ultimate liability for covered claims, provided the association retains the ultimate responsibility to the policyholder or beneficiary for payment of claims covered by the reinsurance agreement. A reinsurance agreement or transfer of liabilities shall be paid for using the association’s available funds from one of its accounts and shall not be charged to administrative expense or allocated to any liquidation estate. The payment and discharge of covered claims shall be undertaken by the association, either directly or through an authorized third-party administrator. Recoveries from a reinsurance agreement or transfer of liabilities shall solely be the property of the association, shall not inure to the benefit of any liquidation estate, and shall be paid to the association account from which the payment for the reinsurance or transfer of liabilities was made.

(b) (1) The association shall be a party in interest in all proceedings involving a covered claim, and shall have the same rights as the insolvent insurer would have had if not in liquidation, including, but not limited to, the right to all of the following:

(A) Appear, defend, and appeal a claim in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(B) Receive notice of, investigate, adjust, compromise, settle, and pay a covered claim.

(C) Investigate, handle, and deny a noncovered claim.

(2) The association shall have no cause of action against the insureds of the insolvent insurer for any sums it has paid out, except as provided by this article.

(3) Paragraph (2) does
 not limit the association’s right to pursue unpaid reimbursements owed by an employer pursuant to a workers’ compensation insurance policy with a deductible if the employer was obligated to reimburse the insurer for benefits payments and related expenses paid by the insurer or the association from a special deposit or from other association funds pursuant to the terms of the policy and related agreements.

(c) (1) If damages against uninsured motorists are recoverable by the claimant from his or her own insurer, the applicable limits of the uninsured motorist coverage shall be a credit against a covered claim payable under this article. A person having a claim that may be recovered under more than one insurance guaranty association or its equivalent shall seek recovery first from the association of the place of residence of the insured, except that if it is a first-party claim for damage to property with a permanent
 location, he or she shall seek recovery first from the association of the permanent location of the property, and if it is a workers’ compensation claim, he or she shall seek recovery first from the association of the residence of the claimant. A recovery under this article shall be reduced by the amount of recovery from any other insurance guaranty association or its equivalent. A member insurer may recover in subrogation from the association only one-half of any amount paid by that insurer under uninsured motorist coverage for bodily injury or wrongful death (and nothing for a payment for anything else), in those cases where the injured person insured by such an insurer has proceeded under his or her uninsured motorist coverage on the ground that the tortfeasor is uninsured as a result of the insolvency of his or her liability insurer (an insolvent insurer as defined in this article), provided that the member insurer shall waive all rights of subrogation against the tortfeasor. An amount paid a claimant in
 excess of the amount authorized by this section may be recovered by action, or other proceeding, brought by the association.

(2) A claimant having collision coverage on a loss that is covered by the insolvent company’s liability policy shall first proceed against his or her collision carrier. That claimant or the collision carrier, if it is a member of the association, does not have the right to sue or continue a suit against the insured of the insolvent insurance company for that collision damage.

(d) The association shall have the right to recover from any person who is an affiliate of the insolvent insurer and whose liability obligations to other persons are satisfied in whole or in part by payments made under this article the amount of any covered claim and allocated claims expense paid on behalf of that person pursuant to this article.

(e) A person having a claim or legal right of recovery under any governmental insurance or guaranty program that is also a covered claim, shall be required to first exhaust his or her right under the program. An amount payable on a covered claim shall be reduced by the amount of any recovery under the program.

(f) “Covered claims” for unearned premium by lenders under insurance premium finance agreements as defined in Section 673 shall be computed as of the earliest cancellation date of the policy pursuant to Section 673.

(g) “Covered claims” shall not include any judgments against or obligations or liabilities of the insolvent insurer or the commissioner, as liquidator, or otherwise resulting from alleged or proven torts, nor shall any default judgment or stipulated judgment against the insolvent insurer, or against
 the insured of the insolvent insurer, be binding against the association.

(h) “Covered claims” shall not include any loss adjustment expenses, including adjustment fees and expenses, attorney’s fees and expenses, court costs, interest, and bond premiums, incurred before the appointment of a liquidator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 154.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.3.

To aid in the detection and prevention of member insurer insolvencies:

(a) The board may, upon majority vote, make recommendations to the commissioner on matters pertaining to regulation for solvency.

(b) The board may prepare a report on the history and causes of any member insurer insolvency in which the association was obligated to pay covered claims, based on the information available to the association, and submit that report along with any recommendations resulting therefrom to the commissioner.

(c) The board may request the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund to prepare, and the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund may provide to the board, a report identifying the aggregate amount of liability, including the estimated exposure for every insurance carrier admitted to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state, under all specific excess workers’ compensation policies in existence for a given period in this state as reported by the private self-insured employers to the Director of Industrial Relations in the annual reports submitted pursuant to Section 3702.2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.4.

(a) Insureds entitled to the protection of this article shall cooperate with the association in accordance with their policies in the same manner as they would have been required to cooperate with their insurer if it were not in liquidation and shall be deemed to have assigned to the association any right to make claim against the liquidator for a refund of unearned premium for the period of coverage provided by the association beginning on the date of the order of liquidation to the date of expiration or cancellation.

(b) Any insured or claimant entitled to the benefits of this article who elects to proceed under this article shall be deemed to have assigned to the association his or her rights against the estate of the insolvent insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 6, Sec. 6.   Effective February 10, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.5.

(a) (1) To the extent necessary to secure funds for the association for payment of the administrative expenses of the association, covered claims of insolvent insurers, and for payment of reasonable costs of adjusting the claims, the association shall collect premium payments from its member insurers sufficient to discharge its obligations.

(2) The association shall allocate its claim payments and costs, incurred or estimated to be incurred, to one or more of the following categories:

(A) Workers’ compensation claims.

(B) Homeowners’
 claims and automobile claims, including all of the following:

(i) Automobile material damage.

(ii) Automobile liability (both personal injury and death and property damage).

(iii) Medical payments.

(iv) Uninsured motorist claims.

(C) Claims other than workers’ compensation, homeowners’, and automobile, as defined above.

(3) Separate premium payments shall be required for each category.

(4) The premium payments for each category shall be used to pay the claims and costs
 allocated to that category.

(b) (1) The rate of premium charged shall be a uniform percentage of net direct written premium in the preceding calendar year applicable to that category.

(2) The rate of premium charges to each member insurer in the appropriate categories shall be based on the net direct written premium of each member insurer as shown in the latest year’s annual financial statement on file with the commissioner.

(3) In cases of a dispute as to the amount of the net direct written premium between the association and one of its member insurers, the written decision of the commissioner shall be final.

(c) Within 90 days after the
 filing of an annual statement, each member insurer shall file a report to the association indicating the amount of premiums not subject to the association’s premium charge and the amount of special excess workers’ compensation premiums for the preceding calendar year. The report is not required in any year in which a premium charge is not made by the association.

(d) In charging premiums to member insurers, the association shall adjust, if necessary, the net direct written premiums shown on a member insurer’s annual statement by excluding any premiums written for any lines of insurance or types of coverage not covered by this article under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1063.1.

(e) (1) The premium charged to any member insurer for any of the
 three categories or a category established by the association shall not be more than 2 percent of the net direct written premium unless there are bonds outstanding that were issued pursuant to Article 14.26 (commencing with Section 1063.70).

(2) If bonds issued pursuant to Article 14.26 (commencing with Section 1063.70) are outstanding, the premium charged to a member insurer for the category for which the bond proceeds are being used to pay claims and expenses shall not be more than 1 percent of the net direct written premium for that category.

(f) (1) The association may exempt or defer, in whole or in part, the premium charge of any member insurer, if the premium charge would cause the member insurer’s financial statement to reflect an amount of capital or surplus
 less than the minimum amounts required for a certificate of authority by any jurisdiction in which the member insurer is authorized to transact insurance. However, during the period of deferment, no dividends shall be paid to shareholders or policyholders by the company whose premium charge was deferred.

(2) Deferred premium charges shall be paid when the payment will not reduce capital or surplus below required minimums.

(g) After all covered claims of insolvent insurers and expenses of administration have been paid, any unused premiums and any reimbursements or claims dividends from liquidators remaining in any category shall be retained by the association and applied to reduce future premium charges in the appropriate category.

(h) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of a member insurer that fails to pay a premium when due and after demand has been made.

(i) Interest at a rate equal to the current federal reserve discount rate plus 212 percent per annum shall be added to the premium of any member insurer that fails to submit the premium requested by the association within 30 days after the mailing request. However, in no event shall the interest rate exceed the legal maximum.

(j) This section shall apply only to premium charges paid on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 408, Sec. 3.   (AB 2154)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.6.

All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party or is obligated to defend a party in any court in the state shall, subject to waiver by the association in specific cases involving covered claims and subject to waiver by the commissioner as to matters that are not covered claims, be stayed for 60 days from the date that an order of liquidation or an order of receivership with a finding of insolvency has been entered by a superior court in this state or by a court in the state of domicile of the insurer, and an additional time thereafter as may be determined necessary by the court to permit proper defense or conduct of all pending causes of action by the association or the commissioner, as applicable. The stay as to matters to which the insolvent insurer is a party shall be superseded by and when an injunction or stay order is entered by the court in this state having jurisdiction of the liquidation or the ancillary liquidation.

The liquidator, receiver, or statutory successor of an insolvent member insurer shall permit reasonable access by the association to the insolvent insurer’s records as is necessary for the association to carry out its duties with regard to covered claims. In addition, the liquidator, receiver, or statutory successor shall provide the association with copies of these records upon the reasonable request of the association and at the expense of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.7.

When a liquidator, domiciliary or ancillary, is appointed in this state for any member insurer, the liquidator shall promptly give notice of his or her appointment and a brief description of the contents of this article and of the nature and functions of the association by prepaid first-class mail, to: (a) all persons known or reasonably expected to have or be interested in claims against the insurer, at the last known address within this state; (b) all insureds of the insurer, at the last known address within this state, accompanied by a notice of the date of termination of insurance; and (c) the board of governors of the association. That notice may, but need not be, combined with the notice provided for in Section 1021. When notice is being provided by an ancillary liquidator, notice is only required to the
 extent information is available to provide the notice. The ancillary liquidator may also rely on the notice provided by the domiciliary liquidator to satisfy the notice requirements of this section. The liquidator may also require that producers of record of the insurer give prompt written notice of the same information, by first-class mail, to their insureds at the last known address within this state. The liquidator shall also promptly publish the notice pursuant to the requirements of Section 1022 and by publication elsewhere in this state as the court shall direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 9.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the association shall be exempt from all license fees, income, franchise, privilege, property, or occupation taxes levied or assessed by this state, any municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state. The rules of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to this article may exempt the association from: filing an annual statement, maintaining minimum required capital, paying any fees or reimbursements, or meeting any other requirement or doing any other thing required by this code or other laws relating to insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.9.

(a) The operation of the association shall at all times be subject to the regulation of the commissioner. The commissioner, or any deputy or examiner, or any person whom the commissioner shall appoint, shall have the power of visitation and examination into the affairs of the association and free access to all books, papers, and documents that relate to the business of the association, may summon and qualify witnesses under oath, and may examine officers, agents or employees, or any other person having knowledge of the affairs, transactions, or conditions of the association.

(b) Any member insurer aggrieved by any action or decision of the association may appeal to the commissioner within 30 days after the action or decision of the association and after exhaustion of administrative remedies may seek court relief as provided in Section 12940.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.10.

All orders or decisions of the commissioner made pursuant to Chapter 1347, Statutes of 1969 (of which this article is a part) and the provisions thereof as amended from time to time, shall be subject to judicial review as provided in Section 12940.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.11.

The commissioner may, upon notice and opportunity for all interested parties to be heard, issue such rules, regulations and orders as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended or repealed in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.12.

(a) The association, its member insurers, and its officers, directors, agents or employees of the association, or its member insurers, shall under no circumstances be liable for any sum in excess of the amount of covered claims of the insolvent insurer, as defined under subdivision (c) of Section 1063.1 of this article and the costs of administration and the costs of loss adjustment, investigation and defenses relating to claims thereunder.
